Oklahoma, session 2026, HJR1013.
Be it Enacted By the People
of the State of Oklahoma."
Petitions and orders for the initiative and for the referendum
shall be filed with the Secretary of State and addressed to the
Governor of the state, who shall submit the same to the people. The
Legislature shall make suitable provisions for carrying into effect
the provisions of this article; provided, that the Legislature may

Req. No. 11016 Page 2

not modify the provisions of this section with respect to the number
of votes required for approval of a measure.
Section 2. Any amendment or amendments to this Constitution may
be proposed in either branch of the Legislature, and if the same
shall be agreed to by a majority of all the members elected to each
of the two (2) houses, such proposed amendment or amendments shall,
with the yeas and nays thereon, be entered in their journals and
referred by the Secretary of State to the people for their approval
or rejection, at the next regular general election, except when the
Legislature, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of each house, shall order a
special election for that purpose. If a majority sixty percent
(60%) of all the electors voting on any proposed amendment at such
election shall vote in favor thereof, it shall thereby become a part
of this Constitution.
No proposal for the amendment or alteration of this Constitution
which is submitted to the voters shall embrace more than one general
subject and the voters shall vote separately for or against each
proposal submitted; provided, however, that in the submission of
proposals for the amendment of this Constitution by articles, which
embrace one general subject, each proposed article shall be deemed a
single proposal or proposition.
SECTION 2. The Ballot Title for the proposed Constitutional
amendment as set forth in SECTION 1 of this resolution shall be in
the following form:
Req. No. 11016 Page 3

BALLOT TITLE
Legislative Referendum No. ____ State Question No. ____
THE GIST OF THE PROPOSITION IS AS FOLLOWS:
This measure amends the Oklahoma Constitution. It amends
Section 3 of Article 5 and it amends Section 2 of Article 24.
The Oklahoma Constitution provides a way to make amendments
either by the initiative petition process or by having the
Legislature refer proposed amendments to the people for their
approval or rejection. This measure would require that any
amendment to the Oklahoma Constitution be approved by sixty
percent (60%) of those voting on the question. Sixty percent
approval would be required whether the amendment was proposed
pursuant to an initiative petition or pursuant to a proposal
submitted to the people by the Legislature.
SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE APPROVED?
FOR THE PROPOSAL — YES _____________
AGAINST THE PROPOSAL — NO _____________
SECTION 3. The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives,
immediately after the passage of this resolution, shall prepare and
file one copy thereof, including the Ballot Title set forth in
SECTION 2 hereof, with the Secretary of State and one copy with the
Attorney General.

60-1-11016 MAH 01/07/25
Req. No. 11016 Page 4